Utah statutes.
13-42-108.   Application for registration -- Public information.

Except for the information required by Subsections 13-42-106(7), (14), and (17) and the addresses required by Subsection 13-42-106(4), the administrator shall make the information in an application for registration as a provider available to the public.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 2006 General Session

